Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2707
Temporary license.

(1) The department shall issue a temporary license to a person who has applied for licensure pursuant to the Perfusion Practice Act and who, in the judgment of the department, with the recommendation of the board, is eligible for examination. An applicant with a temporary license issued under this subsection may practice only under the direct supervision of a perfusionist. The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing such direct supervision which do not require the immediate physical presence of the supervising perfusionist. A temporary license issued under this subsection shall expire one year after the date of issuance and may be renewed for a subsequent one-year period, subject to the rules and regulations adopted under the act. A temporary license issued under this subsection shall be surrendered to the department upon its expiration.

(2) An applicant for licensure pursuant to the act who is a military spouse may apply for a temporary license as provided in section 38-129.01.

Laws 2007, LB236, § 14;

R.S.Supp.,2007, § 71-1,396;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 85.